Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2207
Renewable Fuel Infrastructure Fund; created; use; investment.

The Renewable Fuel Infrastructure Fund is created. The fund shall consist of appropriations made by the Legislature, transfers authorized by the Legislature, grants, and any contributions designated for the purpose of the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The fund shall be administered by the department and used to award grants under the program. No more than ten percent of the fund shall be used for administration of the program.

Laws 2019, LB585, § 7.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.